Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.44.170

Voluntary liquidation—Notice to creditors.

Any bank may, upon receipt of written permission from the director, go into voluntary liquidation by a vote of its stockholders owning two-thirds of its capital stock. When such liquidation is authorized, the directors of such corporation shall publish in a newspaper published in the place where such corporation is located, once a week for four consecutive weeks, a notice requiring creditors of such corporation to present their claims against it for payment.

[ 2014 c 37 s 233; 1994 c 92 s 121; 1955 c 33 s 30.44.170. Prior: 1917 c 80 s 74; RRS s 3281. Formerly RCW 30.44.170.]